Washington statutes.
RCW 15.92.060

Laboratory responsibilities.

The responsibilities of the laboratory shall include:

(1) Evaluating regional requirements for minor crop registration through the federal IR-4 program;

(2) Providing a program for tracking the availability of effective pesticides for minor crops, minor uses, and emergency uses in this state;

(3) Conducting studies on the fate of pesticides on crops and in the environment, including soil, air, and water;

(4) Improving pesticide information and education programs;

(5) Assisting federal and state agencies with questions regarding registration of pesticides which are deemed critical to crop production, consistent with priorities established in RCW 15.92.070; and

(6) Assisting in the registration of biopesticides, pheromones, and other alternative chemical and biological methods.

[ 1995 c 390 s 5; 1991 c 341 s 7.]